Illinois, session 104th, SB1978.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to assist 7homeowners in this State to retain private housing of their 8choice, to relieve those residents from the burdens of 9extraordinary property tax spikes, and to preserve the 10character and unique qualities of the neighborhoods in which 11they live. 12    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 13context otherwise requires, words and phrases have the 14following meanings.15    "Claimant" means a homeowner who has filed a claim for a 16circuit breaker property tax relief grant under this Act.17    "Claim year" means the calendar year prior to the period 18of time during which a claimant may file an application for 19benefits under this Act.20    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.21    "Federal poverty level" means the federal poverty income 22guidelines as determined annually by the United States   SB1978- 2 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1Department of Health and Human Services and updated 2periodically in the Federal Register by that Department under 3the authority of 42 U.S.C. 9902(2).4    "Household" means a claimant or a claimant and his or her 5spouse, if any, living together in the same residence. An 6additional resident may be counted in determining household 7size.8    "Household income" means the combined income of the 9members of a household.10    "Income" means adjusted gross income, properly reportable 11for federal income tax purposes under the provisions of the 12Internal Revenue Code, modified by adding thereto the sum of 13the following amounts to the extent deducted or excluded from 14gross income in the computation of adjusted gross income:15        (1) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued as 16    interest or dividends during the taxable year;17        (2) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by the 18    Illinois Income Tax Act paid for the taxable year;19        (3) An amount equal to all amounts received during the 20    taxable year as an annuity under an annuity, endowment or 21    life insurance contract or under any other contract or 22    agreement;23        (4) An amount equal to the amount of benefits paid 24    under the Federal Social Security Act during the taxable 25    year;26        (5) An amount equal to the amount of benefits paid   SB1978- 3 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1    under the Railroad Retirement Act during the taxable year;2        (6) An amount equal to the total amount of cash public 3    assistance payments received from any governmental agency 4    during the taxable year other than benefits received 5    pursuant to this Act;6        (7) An amount equal to any net operating loss 7    carryover deduction or capital loss carryover deduction 8    during the taxable year; and9        (8) An amount equal to any benefits received under the 10    Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 11    Diseases Act during the taxable year.12    "Income" does not include any distributions or items of 13income described under subparagraph (X) of paragraph (2) of 14subsection (a) of Section 203 of the Illinois Income Tax Act.15    "Income eligibility limitation" means a household income 16not to exceed 4 times the federal poverty level for the 17household size. As an alternative income valuation, a 18homeowner who is enrolled in any of the following programs may 19be presumed to have household income that does not exceed the 20maximum income limitation for that tax year as required by 21this Section: Aid to the Aged, Blind or Disabled (AABD) 22Program or the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program 23(SNAP), both of which are administered by the Department of 24Human Services; the Low Income Home Energy Assistance Program 25(LIHEAP), which is administered by the Department of Commerce 26and Economic Opportunity; The Benefit Access program, which is   SB1978- 4 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1administered by the Department on Aging; and the Senior 2Citizens Real Estate Tax Deferral Program.3    "Internal Revenue Code" means the United States Internal 4Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor law or laws relating to 5federal income taxes in effect for the year.6    "Property taxes accrued" means the ad valorem property 7taxes levied against a residence, but does not include special 8assessments, interest, or charges for service. In the case of 9real estate improved with a multi-dwelling or multipurpose 10building, "property taxes accrued" means property taxes levied 11against a residence within such a building in an amount equal 12to the same percentage of the total property taxes levied 13against that real estate as improved as the value of the 14residence is to the total value of the building. If the 15building is a condominium, the percentage shall be that set 16forth for each residence in the condominium declaration. If 17the multi-dwelling building is owned and operated as a 18cooperative, the value of an individual residence is the value 19of the interest in the cooperative held by the owner of record 20of the legal or equitable interest, other than a leasehold 21interest, in the cooperative which confers the right to occupy 22that residence. In determining the amount of grant under 23Section 20, the applicable "property taxes accrued", as 24determined under this Section, are those due and owing for the 25last preceding taxable year.26    In addition, if the residence is a mobile home as defined   SB1978- 5 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1in and subject to the tax imposed by the Mobile Home Local 2Services Tax Act, "property taxes accrued" includes the amount 3of privilege tax paid during the calendar year for which 4benefits are claimed under that Act on that mobile home. If (i) 5the residence is a mobile home, (ii) the resident is the record 6owner of the property upon which the mobile home is located, 7and (iii) the resident is liable for the taxes imposed under 8the Property Tax Code for both the mobile home and the 9property, then "property taxes accrued" includes the amount of 10property taxes paid on both the mobile home and the property 11upon which the mobile home is located.12    "Property tax bill spike" means that the home has not been 13improved other than by routine maintenance, has been classed 14the same way since the year prior to the last reassessment 15prior to 2022, has had the same owner since the year prior to 16the last reassessment prior to 2022 or was inherited from the 17same owner, and that the property taxes accrued for the 18property have grown at least 25% year over year in any single 19year since the year prior to the last reassessment prior to 202022, provided that a tax bill increase of $500 or less shall 21not constitute a bill spike.22    "Residence" means the principal dwelling place occupied in 23this State by a household and so much of the surrounding land 24as is reasonably necessary for use of the dwelling as a home, 25and includes rental residential property owned by the occupant 26within a multipurpose building. If the assessor has   SB1978- 6 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1established a specific legal description for a portion of 2property constituting the residence, then that portion of 3property shall be deemed "residence" for the purposes of this 4Act.5    "Taxable year" means the calendar year during which ad 6valorem property taxes payable in the next succeeding calendar 7year were levied. 8    Section 15. Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund.9    (a) There is created in the State treasury a Circuit 10Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund.11    (b) The Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund may 12accept funds from the State and from other entities. Once 13grants have been paid, any remaining funds shall be returned 14first to the State and then to other entities that may have 15contributed funds. Other entities that contribute funds may 16elect to leave funds in the Circuit Breaker Property Tax 17Relief Fund for payments related to subsequent tax years.18    (c) Payments from the Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief 19Fund on behalf of or for the benefit of claimants shall be made 20to coincide as closely as possible with the final installment 21of property tax bills and may be issued directly to local 22taxing bodies on behalf of the claimant, provided that the 23property tax bill for claimants is reduced by the amount of 24their claim, whether through an abatement or other means.   SB1978- 7 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1    Section 20. Amount of grant.2    (a) Any individual who: (i) is domiciled in this State; 3(ii) is eligible for and receives either a general homestead 4exemption under Section 15-175 of the Property Tax Code or a 5general alternative homestead exemption under Section 15-176 6of the Property Tax Code; (iii) has experienced property tax 7bill spikes; and (iv) has an income that meets the income 8eligibility limitation is eligible for a grant of a portion of 9their bill spike.10    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, the maximum 11amount of grant to which a claimant is entitled is the one-half 12of the claimant's tax bill spike.13    (c) If title to the residence is held jointly by the 14claimant with a person who is not a member of his or her 15household, the amount of property taxes accrued used in 16computing the amount of grant to which he or she is entitled 17shall be the same percentage of property taxes accrued as is 18the percentage of ownership held by the claimant in the 19residence. 20    Section 25. Application.21    (a) The Chief County Assessment Officer shall establish 22the content, required eligibility and identification 23information, use of social security numbers, and manner of 24applying for benefits in a simplified format under this Act.25    (b) Applications for grants under this Act shall be filed   SB1978- 8 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1online.2    (c) Applications must be filed during the time period 3prescribed by the Chief County Assessment Officer. 4    Section 30. Procedure.5    (a) Claims must be filed after January 1 on forms 6prescribed by the Chief County Assessment Officer. No claim 7may be filed more than one year after December 31 of the tax 8year for which the claim is filed.9    (b) The right to file a claim under this Act shall be 10personal to the claimant and shall not survive his death, but 11such right may be exercised on behalf of a claimant by his 12legal guardian or attorney-in-fact. If a claimant dies after 13having filed a timely claim, the amount thereof shall be 14disbursed on behalf of a person who inherited title to the 15house, provided that such person resided with the claimant at 16the time he or she filed the claim.17    (c) Only one member of a household may file a claim under 18this Act in any calendar year. If both members of a household 19are otherwise entitled to claim a grant under this Act, they 20must agree as to which of them will file a claim for that year.21    (d) A person may not under any circumstances charge a fee 22to a claimant under this Act for assistance in completing an 23application form for a property tax relief grant under this 24Act.   SB1978- 9 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1    Section 35. Administration.2    (a) Upon receipt of a timely filed claim, the Chief County 3Assessment Officer shall determine whether the claimant is a 4person entitled to a grant under this Act and the amount of 5grant to which he is entitled under this Act. The Chief County 6Assessment Officer may require the claimant to furnish 7reasonable proof of the statements of domicile, household 8income, property taxes accrued and other matters on which 9entitlement is based, and may withhold approval of a grant 10until such additional proof is furnished. If the Chief County 11Assessment Officer provides such information from other 12records available to them, the claimant may rebut or augment 13such information.14    (b) The Chief County Assessment Officer shall deny claims 15which have been fraudulently prepared or when he or she finds 16that the claimant has acquired title to his residence or has 17paid rent for his residence primarily for the purpose of 18receiving a grant under this Act. 19    Section 40. Payment and denial of claims.20    (a) In general. The Fund shall make payments, from 21appropriations made for that purpose of grants to claimants 22under this Act and from other entities, in the amounts to which 23the Chief County Assessment Officer has determined they are 24entitled, respectively. If a claim is denied, the Chief County 25Assessment Officer shall cause written notice of that denial   SB1978- 10 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1and the reasons for that denial to be sent to the claimant.2    (b) Payment of claims one dollar and under. Where the 3amount of the grant computed under Section 20 is less than one 4dollar, the claimant shall receive one dollar.5    (c) Right to appeal. Any person aggrieved by an action or 6determination arising under this Act may request in writing 7reconsideration of that action or determination, setting out 8the facts upon which the request is based. 9    Section 45. Fraud; error.10    (a) Any person who files a fraudulent claim for a grant 11under this Act, or who for compensation prepares a claim for a 12grant and knowingly enters false information on an application 13for any claimant under this Act, or who fraudulently files 14multiple applications, files a fraudulent request for payment, 15is guilty of a Class 4 felony for the first offense and is 16guilty of a Class 3 felony for each subsequent offense.17    (b) The Department may recover from a claimant any amount 18paid to that claimant under this Act on account of an erroneous 19or fraudulent claim, together with 6% interest per year. 20Amounts recoverable from a claimant by the Department under 21this Act may, but need not, be recovered by offsetting the 22amount owed against any future grant payable to the person 23under this Act.24    (c) A prosecution for a violation of this Section may be 25commenced at any time within 3 years of the commission of that   SB1978- 11 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1violation. 2    Section 50. Arrangements. No inference, implication, or 3presumption of legislative construction shall be drawn or made 4by reason of the location or grouping of any particular 5Section or provision of this Act. 6    Section 55. Severability. If any clause, sentence, 7Section, provision or part of this Act or the application 8thereof to any person or circumstance shall be adjudged to be 9unconstitutional, the remainder of this Act or its application 10to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is 11held invalid, shall not be affected thereby. 12    Section 60. Rules.13    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, 14the Chief County Assessment Officer may adopt rules regarding 15applications, proof of eligibility, required identification 16information, use of social security numbers, and counting of 17income.18    (b) The Chief County Assessment Officer may, subject to 19appropriations made for that purpose:20        (1) attempt to secure the cooperation of appropriate 21    federal, State and local agencies in securing the names 22    and addresses of persons to whom this Act pertains;23        (2) prepare a mailing list of persons eligible for   SB1978- 12 -LRB104 11443 HLH 21531 b1    grants under this Act; and2        (3) secure the cooperation of the Department of 3    Revenue, other State agencies, local business 4    establishments, and interest groups to educate the public 5    about the application process under this Act to those 6    eligible to file claims. 7    Section 900. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 8Section 5.1030 as follows: 9    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)10    Sec. 5.1030. The Circuit Breaker Property Tax Relief Fund. 11    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.